Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5268.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 9.94A.701 and 2021 c 242 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:(1) If an offender is sentenced to the custody of the department for one of the following crimes, the court shall, in addition to the other terms of the sentence, sentence the offender to community custody for three years:(a) A sex offense not sentenced under RCW 9.94A.507; or(b) A serious violent offense.(2) A court shall, in addition to the other terms of the sentence, sentence an offender to community custody for eighteen months when the court sentences the person to the custody of the department for a violent offense that is not considered a serious violent offense.(3) A court shall, in addition to the other terms of the sentence, sentence an offender to community custody for one year when the court sentences the person to the custody of the department for:(a) Any crime against persons under RCW 9.94A.411(2);(b) An offense involving the unlawful possession of a firearm under RCW 9.41.040, where the offender is a criminal street gang member or associate;(c) A felony offense under chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW, committed on or after July 1, 2000; ((or))(d) A felony violation of RCW 9A.44.132(1) (failure to register) that is the offender's first violation for a felony failure to register; or(e) An offense involving the unlawful possession of a firearm under RCW 9.41.040.(4) If an offender is sentenced under the drug offender sentencing alternative, the court shall impose community custody as provided in RCW 9.94A.660.(5) If an offender is sentenced under the special sex offender sentencing alternative, the court shall impose community custody as provided in RCW 9.94A.670.(6) If an offender is sentenced to a work ethic camp, the court shall impose community custody as provided in RCW 9.94A.690.(7) If an offender is sentenced under the parenting sentencing alternative, the court shall impose a term of community custody as provided in RCW 9.94A.655.(8) If the offender is sentenced under the mental health sentencing alternative, the court shall impose a term of community custody as provided in RCW 9.94A.695.(9) If a sex offender is sentenced as a nonpersistent offender pursuant to RCW 9.94A.507, the court shall impose community custody as provided in that section.(10) The term of community custody specified by this section shall be reduced by the court whenever an offender's standard range term of confinement in combination with the term of community custody exceeds the statutory maximum for the crime as provided in RCW 9A.20.021.Sec. 2. RCW 9.94A.701 and 2024 c 306 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:(1) If an offender is sentenced to the custody of the department for one of the following crimes, the court shall, in addition to the other terms of the sentence, sentence the offender to community custody for three years:(a) A sex offense not sentenced under RCW 9.94A.507; or(b) A serious violent offense.(2) A court shall, in addition to the other terms of the sentence, sentence an offender to community custody for 18 months when the court sentences the person to the custody of the department for a violent offense that is not considered a serious violent offense.(3) A court shall, in addition to the other terms of the sentence, sentence an offender to community custody for one year when the court sentences the person to the custody of the department for:(a) Any crime against persons under RCW 9.94A.411(2);(b) An offense involving the unlawful possession of a firearm under RCW 9.41.040, where the offender is a criminal street gang member or associate;(c) A felony offense under chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW, committed on or after July 1, 2000; ((or))(d) A felony violation of RCW 9A.44.132(1) (failure to register) that is the offender's first violation for a felony failure to register; or(e) An offense involving the unlawful possession of a firearm under RCW 9.41.040.(4) If an offender is sentenced under the drug offender sentencing alternative, the court shall impose community custody as provided in:(a) RCW 9.94A.660 and 9.94A.662 for a prison-based drug offender sentencing alternative;(b) RCW 9.94A.660 and 9.94A.664 for a residential-based drug offender sentencing alternative;(c) RCW 9.94A.662 and 9.94A.661(6) for a prison-based drug offender sentencing alternative for driving under the influence; and(d) RCW 9.94A.661 (5) and (6) for a residential-based drug offender sentencing alternative for driving under the influence.(5) If an offender is sentenced under the special sex offender sentencing alternative, the court shall impose community custody as provided in RCW 9.94A.670.(6) If an offender is sentenced to a work ethic camp, the court shall impose community custody as provided in RCW 9.94A.690.(7) If an offender is sentenced under the parenting sentencing alternative, the court shall impose a term of community custody as provided in RCW 9.94A.655.(8) If the offender is sentenced under the mental health sentencing alternative, the court shall impose a term of community custody as provided in RCW 9.94A.695.(9) If a sex offender is sentenced as a nonpersistent offender pursuant to RCW 9.94A.507, the court shall impose community custody as provided in that section.(10) The term of community custody specified by this section shall be reduced by the court whenever an offender's standard sentence range term of confinement in combination with the term of community custody exceeds the statutory maximum for the crime as provided in RCW 9A.20.021.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. Section 1 of this act expires January 1, 2026.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. Section 2 of this act takes effect January 1, 2026.--- END ---